Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-1208
Occupation tax; imposition or increase; annual report; contents.

No later than ninety days after the end of the fiscal year, each municipality that imposes a new occupation tax or increases the rate of an existing occupation tax on or after June 5, 2025, shall provide an annual report on the collection and use of such occupation tax. The report shall be posted on the municipality's public website or made available for public inspection at a location designated by the municipality. The report shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) A list of all such occupation taxes collected by the municipality;

(2) The amount generated annually by each such occupation tax;

(3) Whether funds generated by each such occupation tax are deposited in the general fund, cash funds, or other funds of the municipality;

(4) Whether any such occupation tax is dedicated for a specific purpose, and if so, the amount dedicated for such purpose; and

(5) The scheduled or projected termination date, if any, of each such occupation tax.

Laws 2012, LB745, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB445, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 55;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 22.